Massachusetts, session 194th, H500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 180 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following section:-
Section 30.
(a) Any corporation, which does not possess legal or appointed governmental power at
the municipal or state level, shall be required to issue a disclaimer stating that they are a non-
governmental organization, and that any written or digital information they have made accessible
to the public has been developed by their organization. Such a disclaimer shall be posted in a
conspicuous and easily accessible place, including, but not limited to, the corporation’s website.
Any corporation that is or plans to participate in lobbying for legislative proposals shall
post said disclaimer on the corporation’s:
(i) e-mail;
of 2

(ii) website;
(iii) social media platforms;
(iv) and any other form of digital content accessible to the public.
(b) For the purpose of this section, the term, “Public record”, shall mean, any written
statement, audio or video recording of a public proceeding, including, but not limited to a public
hearing.
(c) Any corporation and their representatives speaking on behalf of their proposals in a
public forum, including, but not limited to, town meetings and public hearings at the state and
local levels, shall submit a disclaimer to be included on public record stating their status as a
non-governmental organization. Such a disclaimer shall be made readily accessible to the public
when requested through a public records request.
(d) All corporations shall include a statement on their website, and any of their written or
digital content that is accessible to the public, which includes information clearly stating the
sources of their funding, including, but not limited to any individuals, groups of people, or
committees providing financial support to the corporation. Such a statement shall be posted in a
conspicuous and easily accessible format for the public.
of 2